.aura/ephemeral_app.lexc
! Ephemeral Application Grammar for AuraOS
! Six-slot morphotactic constraint: DIR → ASP → CLASS → SUBJ → VOICE → STEM
! Lexicon names follow aura_lexc.py's slot_for_source mapping:
!   Root → DIR, Gate → ASP, Action → CLASS, Target → SUBJ, Physics → VOICE, Terminal → STEM
! MVP: read-only repository investigation only.
! The FST is an admission grammar, not a security sandbox.

! ==============================================================================
! DIR — Lifecycle direction (Root lexicon)
! ==============================================================================
MultiCharacterSymbols
CREATE        CREATE
PREPARE       PREPARE
RUN           RUN
PAUSE         PAUSE
DISSOLVE      DISSOLVE
CRYSTALLIZE_REQUEST CRYSTALLIZE_REQUEST
End

! ==============================================================================
! ASP — Duration/execution aspect (Gate lexicon)
! ==============================================================================
MultiCharacterSymbols
ONCE          ONCE
SESSION       SESSION
TTL           TTL
End

! ==============================================================================
! CLASS — Effect class (Action lexicon)
! ==============================================================================
MultiCharacterSymbols
READ          READ
COMPUTE       COMPUTE
WRITE_TEMP    WRITE_TEMP
NETWORK       NETWORK
DEVICE        DEVICE
INSTALL       INSTALL
SECRET_ACCESS SECRET_ACCESS
PRODUCTION_MUTATION PRODUCTION_MUTATION
End

! ==============================================================================
! SUBJ — Target resource (Target lexicon)
! ==============================================================================
MultiCharacterSymbols
CODEMAP              CODEMAP
MODULE_MANIFEST      MODULE_MANIFEST
SOURCE_SLICE         SOURCE_SLICE
TOPOLOGY             TOPOLOGY
AFFORDANCE_DIRECTORY AFFORDANCE_DIRECTORY
CAPABILITY_LANES     CAPABILITY_LANES
PLUGIN_MANIFESTS     PLUGIN_MANIFESTS
TEMP_WORKSPACE       TEMP_WORKSPACE
UI_SCHEMA            UI_SCHEMA
EXTERNAL_ENDPOINT    EXTERNAL_ENDPOINT
PRODUCTION_SOURCE    PRODUCTION_SOURCE
PRIVATE_MEMORY       PRIVATE_MEMORY
End

! ==============================================================================
! VOICE — Authority/execution context (Physics lexicon)
! ==============================================================================
MultiCharacterSymbols
HUMAN_REQUESTED    HUMAN_REQUESTED
AURA_VERIFIED      AURA_VERIFIED
AGENT_PROPOSED     AGENT_PROPOSED
GOVERNANCE_APPROVED GOVERNANCE_APPROVED
SANDBOX_ONLY       SANDBOX_ONLY
End

! ==============================================================================
! STEM — Terminal operation (Terminal lexicon)
! ==============================================================================
MultiCharacterSymbols
RESOLVE_CAPABILITIES RESOLVE_CAPABILITIES
QUERY               QUERY
READ_SLICE          READ_SLICE
BUILD_GRAPH         BUILD_GRAPH
RENDER_SCHEMA       RENDER_SCHEMA
EXECUTE_COMPONENT   EXECUTE_COMPONENT
VERIFY              VERIFY
DISSOLVE            DISSOLVE
PROPOSE_CRYSTALLIZATION PROPOSE_CRYSTALLIZATION
End

! ==============================================================================
! LEXICON: Root (DIR — lifecycle direction)
! ==============================================================================
LEXICON Root
CREATE:               Gate ;
PREPARE:              Gate ;
RUN:                  Gate ;
PAUSE:                Gate ;
DISSOLVE:             Gate ;
CRYSTALLIZE_REQUEST:  Gate ;
END

! ==============================================================================
! LEXICON: Gate (ASP — duration/execution aspect)
! ==============================================================================
LEXICON Gate
ONCE:     Action ;
SESSION:  Action ;
TTL:      Action ;
END

! ==============================================================================
! LEXICON: Action (CLASS — effect class)
! ==============================================================================
LEXICON Action
READ:               Target ;
COMPUTE:            Target ;
WRITE_TEMP:         Target ;
! Blocked effects — machine router routes these to BLOCKED_WITH_REASON
NETWORK:            Target ;
DEVICE:             Target ;
INSTALL:            Target ;
SECRET_ACCESS:      Target ;
PRODUCTION_MUTATION: Target ;
END

! ==============================================================================
! LEXICON: Target (SUBJ — target resource)
! ==============================================================================
LEXICON Target
CODEMAP:              Physics ;
MODULE_MANIFEST:      Physics ;
SOURCE_SLICE:         Physics ;
TOPOLOGY:             Physics ;
AFFORDANCE_DIRECTORY: Physics ;
CAPABILITY_LANES:     Physics ;
PLUGIN_MANIFESTS:     Physics ;
TEMP_WORKSPACE:       Physics ;
UI_SCHEMA:            Physics ;
! Blocked targets — machine router routes these to BLOCKED_WITH_REASON
EXTERNAL_ENDPOINT:    Physics ;
PRODUCTION_SOURCE:    Physics ;
PRIVATE_MEMORY:       Physics ;
END

! ==============================================================================
! LEXICON: Physics (VOICE — authority/execution context)
! ==============================================================================
LEXICON Physics
HUMAN_REQUESTED:     Terminal ;
AURA_VERIFIED:       Terminal ;
AGENT_PROPOSED:      Terminal ;
GOVERNANCE_APPROVED: Terminal ;
SANDBOX_ONLY:        Terminal ;
END

! ==============================================================================
! LEXICON: Terminal (STEM — terminal operation)
! ==============================================================================
LEXICON Terminal
RESOLVE_CAPABILITIES: # ;
QUERY:                # ;
READ_SLICE:           # ;
BUILD_GRAPH:          # ;
RENDER_SCHEMA:        # ;
EXECUTE_COMPONENT:    # ;
VERIFY:               # ;
DISSOLVE:             # ;
PROPOSE_CRYSTALLIZATION: # ;
END
